California statutes. Public Resources Code
(A) The assessment shall be added by a manufacturer to the purchase price of all carpet sold by manufacturers to a California retailer or wholesaler or otherwise sold for use in the state. The assessment shall be clearly visible on invoices or functionally equivalent billing documents as a separate line item and shall be accompanied by a brief description of the assessment or a label approved by the department.

(B) Each retailer and wholesaler shall
 add the assessment to the purchase price of all carpet sold in the state. The assessment shall be clearly visible on invoices or functionally equivalent billing documents as a separate line item and shall be accompanied by a brief description of the assessment or a label approved by the department.

(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that the amount of the assessment be reduced by the stewardship organization as the carpet stewardship program is implemented over time and becomes more efficient.

(5) (A) If the amount of the assessment is insufficient to fund the carpet stewardship program, the stewardship organization shall submit a plan update to the department for approval, conditional approval, or disapproval to increase the assessment.

(B) If the assessment generates a fund balance at the
 end of a program year that is greater than one year’s operating costs of the carpet stewardship program, the stewardship organization shall submit a plan update to the department for approval, conditional approval, or disapproval to reduce the assessment.

(6) A carpet stewardship organization shall not expend funds from the assessment for any of the following purposes:

(A) Penalties imposed pursuant to Section 42978.

(B) Costs associated with litigation against the state.

(C) Engineered municipal solid waste conversion, as defined in Section 40131.2, the use of cement kilns to burn carpet, or transformation, as defined in Section 40201.

(d) A carpet stewardship organization that submits a
 plan pursuant to this section shall consult with retailers and wholesalers in the development of the plan, in order to minimize the impacts of the plan on retailers and wholesalers.

(e) A carpet stewardship organization shall notify the department within 30 days after instituting a significant or material change to an approved carpet stewardship plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 2.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42972.1.

(a) The Director of Resources Recycling and Recovery shall appoint members to an advisory committee, which shall make recommendations on carpet stewardship plans submitted to the department pursuant to Section 42972. The Speaker of the Assembly and the Senate Committee on Rules shall each appoint one additional member to the advisory committee. The advisory committee may be composed of, among others, individuals in the environmental community, the solid waste industry, and local government, public or private representatives involved in the collection, processing, and recycling of carpet, and other interested parties as determined
 by the Director of Resources Recycling and Recovery. The Director of Resources Recycling and Recovery shall appoint to the advisory committee one member who represents carpet manufacturers and at least one member who is a representative of either the Southern California Resilient Floor and Decorative Covering Crafts Joint Apprenticeship and Training Committee or the Northern California Floor Covering Finishing Trades Institute Joint Apprenticeship Training Committee.

(b) A carpet stewardship organization or manufacturer, as applicable, shall provide to the advisory committee a copy of the carpet stewardship plan or amendments to the plan no less than 30 days before submitting the carpet stewardship plan or amendments to the plan to the department pursuant Section 42972. A carpet stewardship organization or manufacturer, as applicable, shall provide to the advisory committee a copy of the annual report required pursuant to Section 42976 no less than 30 days before submitting the annual report to the department. The advisory committee shall provide comments and recommendations to the carpet stewardship organization or manufacturer and to the department based on their review of the materials.

(c) A carpet stewardship organization or manufacturer, as applicable, shall incorporate to the extent feasible the advisory committee’s recommendations into the carpet stewardship plan, amendments to the plan, or annual report before submitting the plan, amendments to the plan, or annual report to the department. If the carpet stewardship organization or manufacturer is unable to incorporate the recommendations, it shall provide a written explanation to the department and the advisory committee. The explanation shall detail whether the carpet stewardship organization or manufacturer plans to incorporate the recommendations into a subsequent carpet stewardship plan, subsequent amendments to the plan, or a subsequent annual report.

(d) A member of the advisory committee shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred in the performance of his or her official duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 794, Sec. 3.   (AB 1158)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42972.2.

(a) The Legislature hereby declares that it is the goal of the state to reach a 24-percent recycling rate for postconsumer carpet by January 1, 2020, and to meet or exceed that rate continually thereafter.

(b) No sooner than January 1, 2020, and no less frequently than every three years thereafter, the department shall review and may adjust the recycling rate and program goals set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42972, based on information included in carpet stewardship plans and annual reports, other information provided by carpet stewardship organizations, and economic and any other relevant information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 794, Sec. 4.   (AB 1158)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42972.3.

(a) The department may audit the carpet stewardship organization or an individual manufacturer annually.

(b) It is a violation of this chapter for the carpet stewardship organization, manufacturer, or their respective agent who holds records to fail to produce, as part of a department audit or review of a third-party audit, documents or data that is requested by the department or documents or data that is required to be collected or generated to carry out operation of the carpet stewardship plan in the form and manner determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 3.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42972.7.

(a) (1) A carpet stewardship organization, as part of its carpet stewardship plan, shall set up a trust fund or an escrow account, into which it shall deposit all unexpended funds and ongoing consumer assessments, for use in accordance with this section in the event that the plan terminates or is revoked.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “unexpended funds” means assessment money in the stewardship organization’s accounts that the stewardship organization is not already obligated to pay pursuant to a contract, claim, or similar mechanism.

(b) If a carpet stewardship plan terminates or is revoked, the trustee or escrow agent of a trust fund or escrow
 account set up pursuant to subdivision (a) shall do both of the following, starting within 30 days:

(1) Accept carpet stewardship assessment payments directly from manufacturers into the trust fund or escrow account that would have been made to the stewardship organization prior to the carpet stewardship plan’s termination or revocation.

(2) Make payments from the trust fund or escrow account as the department shall direct, in writing, to implement the most recently approved plan.

(c) If a new carpet stewardship plan has not been approved by the department within one year after termination or revocation, the department may make modifications to the previously approved plan, as it deems necessary, and continue to direct payments from the trust fund or escrow account in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b)
 to implement the modified plan.

(d) A trustee or escrow agent in possession of assessment funds shall, as directed by the department, transfer those funds to a successor carpet stewardship organization with an approved plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 680, Sec. 4.   (AB 729)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42973.

(a) (1) Within 60 days after the department receives a plan submitted pursuant to Section 42972, it shall review the plan, determine whether it complies with Section 42972, and notify the submitter of its decision to approve or not approve the plan.

(2) On or after April 1, 2015, an organization appointed by one or more manufacturers to act as an agent on behalf of the manufacturer to design, submit, and administer a carpet stewardship plan pursuant to this chapter may submit a plan to the department pursuant to Section 42972 and that plan may be approved by the department, subject to the requirements of paragraph (1), only if the department makes both of the following
 findings:

(A) The plan will not have the effect of reducing the level of diversion and recycling of postconsumer carpet that has been achieved pursuant to this chapter at the time the department reviews the plan.

(B) The amount of the assessment in the plan will not create an unfair advantage in the marketplace for one or more of the companies in the organization.

(b) If the department does not approve the plan, it shall describe the reasons for its disapproval in the notice. The submitter may revise and resubmit the plan within 60 days after receiving notice of disapproval and the department shall review and approve or not approve the revised plan within 60 days after receipt. Any plan not approved by March 31, 2012, shall be out of compliance with this chapter and the submitter of the plan is subject to the
 penalties specified in Section 42978 until the plan is approved by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 681, Sec. 2.   (AB 2398)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42973.5.

A carpet stewardship organization shall provide to the department all data necessary for the department to evaluate the effectiveness of the program as it is described in the carpet stewardship plan and in annual reports submitted by the carpet stewardship organization. This data shall include, but is not limited to, the costs of collection and of processing and recycling postconsumer carpet, and any other data necessary to determine whether the amount of the assessment, as proposed in the stewardship plan pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 42972, will be sufficient to achieve the goals of this chapter and the goals established in the carpet stewardship plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 794, Sec. 6.   (AB 1158)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42973.7.

(a) A carpet stewardship organization shall include nonvoting board members with representation from the following types of entities:

(1) A circular economy environmental nongovernmental organization.

(2) A retailer that sells covered products.

(3) A labor representative from a floor covering joint apprenticeship program in northern California that is approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards.

(4) A labor representative from a floor covering joint apprenticeship program in southern California that is approved by the Division of Apprenticeship
 Standards.

(b) A carpet stewardship organization shall pay the travel costs and other expenses for the nonvoting members identified in subdivision (a) to participate in all board meetings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 4.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42973.9.

A carpet stewardship organization shall be responsible for a carpet stewardship plan and shall make decisions regarding the implementation of a carpet stewardship plan, consistent with this chapter. A carpet stewardship organization shall not delegate any responsibility of its board of directors, or any decisionmaking responsibility regarding a carpet stewardship plan, to a person who is not a member of its board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 5.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42974.

(a) The department shall enforce this chapter.

(b) On and after April 1, 2012, a manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer that offers a carpet for sale in this state, or who offers a carpet for promotional purposes in this state, is not in compliance with this chapter and is subject to penalties pursuant to Section 42978, if the carpet is not subject to a plan that is submitted by an organization that includes the manufacturer of that carpet, which plan has been approved by the department pursuant to Section 42973.

(c) (1) On July 1, 2012, and not later than January 1 and July 1 annually thereafter, the department shall post a notice on its internet website listing manufacturers that
 are in compliance with this chapter.

(2) A manufacturer that is not listed on the department’s internet website pursuant to this subdivision, but demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that the manufacturer is in compliance with this chapter before the next notice is required to be posted, may request a certification letter from the department stating that the manufacturer is in compliance. The letter shall constitute proof of compliance with this chapter.

(d) A wholesaler or retailer that distributes or sells carpet shall monitor the department’s internet website to determine if the sale of a manufacturer’s carpet is in compliance with the requirements of this chapter. Notwithstanding Section 42978, a wholesaler or retailer otherwise in compliance with this chapter shall be deemed in compliance with this section if, on the date the wholesaler or retailer ordered or
 purchased carpet, the manufacturer was listed as a compliant manufacturer on the department’s internet website.

(e) If a carpet stewardship plan that was previously approved by the department pursuant to Section 42973 terminates or is revoked, the department may allow a manufacturer that is no longer subject to that plan because the plan terminated or was revoked to continue to sell carpet in California for a period of one year after the plan terminated or was revoked, without being subject to penalties pursuant to this section or Section 42978, if the manufacturer does either of the following:

(1) The manufacturer continues to operate under the most recent approved carpet stewardship plan that the manufacturer was subject to and makes assessment payments to the trust fund or escrow account as provided for in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 42972.7.

(2) The manufacturer provides the department with an alternative carpet recycling plan governing its own products that are sold in California, and the department approves the manufacturer’s alternative carpet recycling plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 680, Sec. 5.   (AB 729)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42975.

(a) In order to achieve compliance with this chapter, a carpet stewardship organization shall, on or before September 1 of each year, demonstrate to the department that it has achieved the amount and rates of recycling and a reduction in disposal of postconsumer carpet subject to its stewardship plan and the other goals included in the organization’s plan pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42972. In determining compliance, the department shall consider all of the following:

(1) The baseline rate of compliance against
 which the demonstrated improvement is compared, including progress in achieving the goals outlined in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42972.

(2) The quantifiable five-year goals and annual goals included in the carpet stewardship plan pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42972.

(3) Information provided in the organization’s report to the department pursuant to Section 42976.

(b) If more than one organization submits a carpet stewardship plan pursuant to this chapter, the department shall use information submitted by the organization in its annual report pursuant to Section 42976 to determine to what extent the recycling rates, the reductions in disposal rates, and the achievement of the other goals included in the plan are attributable to each
 organization and shall determine compliance with this chapter accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 340, Sec. 1.   (AB 2097)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42976.

On or before September 1 of each year, a manufacturer of carpet sold in the state shall, individually or through a carpet stewardship organization, submit to the department a report describing its activities to achieve the purposes of this chapter, as described in Section 42970, and to comply with Section 42975. At a minimum, the report shall include all of the following:

(a) The amount of carpet sold by square yards and weight, in the state during the reporting period. A carpet stewardship organization with more than one manufacturer may use average
 weight.

(b) The amount of postconsumer carpet recycled, by weight, during the reporting period.

(c) The amount of postconsumer carpet recovered but not recycled, by weight, and its ultimate disposition.

(d) The total cost of implementing the carpet stewardship plan.

(e) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the carpet stewardship plan, and anticipated steps, if needed, to improve performance.

(f) Examples of educational materials that were provided to consumers during the reporting period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   (AB 2097)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42977.

(a) The carpet stewardship organization submitting a carpet stewardship plan shall pay the department a quarterly administrative fee. The department shall set the fee at an amount that, when paid by every carpet stewardship organization that submits a carpet stewardship plan, is adequate to cover the department’s full costs of administering and enforcing this chapter, including any program development costs or regulatory costs incurred by the department prior to carpet stewardship plans being submitted. The department may establish a variable fee based on relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the portion of carpets sold in the state by members of the organization compared to the total amount of carpet sold in the state by all organizations submitting a carpet stewardship plan.

(b) The total amount of fees collected annually pursuant to this section shall not exceed the amount necessary to recover costs incurred by the department in connection with the administration and enforcement of the requirements of this chapter.

(c) The department shall identify the direct development or regulatory costs it incurs pursuant to this chapter prior to the submittal of a carpet stewardship plan and shall establish a fee in an amount adequate to cover those costs, which shall be paid by a carpet stewardship organization that submits a carpet stewardship plan. The fee established pursuant to this subdivision shall be paid pursuant to the schedule specified in subdivision (d).

(d) A carpet stewardship organization subject to this section shall pay a quarterly fee to the department to cover the administrative and enforcement costs of the requirements of this chapter pursuant to subdivision (a) on or before July 1, 2012, and every three months thereafter and the applicable portion of the fee pursuant to subdivision (c) on July 1, 2012, and every three months thereafter through July 1, 2014.

(e) The department shall deposit the fees collected pursuant to this section into the Carpet Stewardship Account created pursuant to Section 42977.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 680, Sec. 6.   (AB 729)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42977.1.

(a) The Carpet Stewardship Account and the Carpet Stewardship Penalty Subaccount are hereby established in the Integrated Waste Management Fund.

(b) All fees collected by the department pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Carpet Stewardship Account and may be expended by the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to cover the department’s costs to implement this chapter.

(c) All civil penalties collected pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Carpet Stewardship Penalty Subaccount and may be expended by the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to cover the department’s costs to
 implement this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 681, Sec. 2.   (AB 2398)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42978.

(a) A civil penalty up to the following amounts may be administratively imposed by the department on any person who is in violation of any provision of this chapter:

(1) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day.

(2) Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per day if the violation is intentional, knowing, or negligent.

(b) In assessing or reviewing the amount of a civil penalty imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) for a violation of this chapter, the department or the court shall consider all of the following:

(1) The nature and extent of the violation.

(2) The number and severity of the violation or violations.

(3) The economic effect of the penalty on the violator.

(4) Whether the violator took good faith measures to comply with this chapter and the period of time over which these measures were taken.

(5) The willfulness of the violator’s misconduct.

(6) The deterrent effect that the imposition of the penalty would have on both the violator and the regulated community.

(7) Any other factor that justice may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 6.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42979.

(a) This chapter does not limit, supersede, duplicate, or otherwise conflict with the authority of the Department of Toxic Substances Control under Section 25257.1 of the Health and Safety Code to fully implement Article 14 (commencing with Section 25251) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, including the authority of the department to include a carpet in a product registry adopted pursuant to that article.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the Department of Toxic Substances Control shall fully consider the measures taken by the carpet industry pursuant to this chapter, and the results of those measures, when considering whether to include carpet in a product registry adopted
 pursuant to, or to otherwise regulate carpet pursuant to, Article 14 (commencing with Section 25251) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 681, Sec. 2.   (AB 2398)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42980.

If the department determines that a carpet stewardship organization or manufacturer has not complied with one or more of the requirements of this chapter, the department may, through a public process, adopt regulations that establish requirements for carpet stewardship organizations and manufacturers to take specific actions in order to bring the carpet stewardship organization or manufacturer into compliance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 7.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42981.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any action by a carpet stewardship organization or its members that relates to any of the following is not a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), or the Unfair Competition Law (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code):

(1) The creation, implementation, or management of a carpet stewardship plan approved by the department pursuant to Section 42973 and the types or quantities of carpet being recycled or otherwise managed as described in
 Section 42970.

(2) The cost and structure of an approved carpet stewardship plan.

(3) The establishment, administration, or disbursement of a carpet stewardship assessment as described in Section 42972.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to an agreement that does any of the following:

(1) Fixes a price of or for carpet, except for any agreement related to a carpet stewardship assessment pursuant to a carpet stewardship plan approved by the department and otherwise in accordance with this chapter.

(2) Fixes the output of production of carpet.

(3) Restricts the geographic area in which, or customers to whom, carpet will be
 sold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 680, Sec. 8.   (AB 729)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42982.

The Department of General Services shall, to the extent feasible and within existing resources, take appropriate steps, including, but not limited to, revising relevant procurement rules, to ensure both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) Postconsumer carpet that is removed from state buildings is managed in a manner consistent with the purpose of this chapter.

(b) Carpet purchased by a state agency contains a minimum amount of postconsumer content that shall be determined by the Department of General Services and published in the State Contracting Manual by July 1, 2018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 794, Sec. 9.   (AB 1158)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42983.

It is the intent of the Legislature to review any federal law that has the purpose of managing postconsumer carpet in a manner consistent with this chapter and to consider the extent to which the program created by that federal law will, at a minimum, achieve the same levels of landfill diversion and recycling of postconsumer carpet in California as this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 681, Sec. 2.   (AB 2398)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative pursuant to Section 42983.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42983.5.

This chapter shall become inoperative when all the following are met:

(a) The department has adopted regulations pursuant to Section 42968.1.

(b) The department has approved a producer responsibility plan, as defined by Section 42968, for the purposes of Chapter 19.5 (commencing with Section 42968).

(c) The department has provided notice to the producer responsibility organization of its intent to send the letter described in subdivision (d) at least 90 days before sending the letter.

(d) The department has submitted to the relevant committees of the Legislature a letter
 indicating that the conditions in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, have been met, that the department is prepared to implement Chapter 19.5 (commencing with Section 42968), and that the producer responsibility organization is prepared to implement the producer responsibility plan. The department shall post the letter on its internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 8.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 20.5. Responsible Textile Recovery Act of 2024 [42984. - 42984.27.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions  [42984. - 42984.3.]

42984.

This act may be known, and shall be cited, as the Responsible Textile Recovery Act of 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.05.

(a) The intent of this chapter is to establish a statewide extended producer responsibility program for apparel and textile articles that emphasizes repair and reuse, and minimizes generation of hazardous waste, generation of greenhouse gases, environmental impacts, environmental justice impacts, and public health impacts.

(b) Due to distinct market elements associated with the textile and apparel industry that can utilize direct-to-consumer transactions from an overseas manufacturer to a consumer, the provisions of this chapter associated with online marketplaces are intended to be unique to this sector.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.1.

(a) The purpose of this chapter is to increase the amount of postconsumer apparel and textile articles that are diverted from landfills and reused, repaired, and recycled into secondary products or otherwise managed in a manner that is consistent with the state’s hierarchy for waste management practices pursuant to Section 40051.

(b) It is the purpose of this chapter that any producer, regardless of whether that producer is domiciled in California, who sells, offers for sale, or distributes a covered product into the state shall be responsible for complying with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.2.

The department, acting in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 11340) to Article 8 (commencing with Section 11350), inclusive, of the Administrative Procedure Act, as set forth in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, shall adopt regulations to implement this chapter with an effective date of no earlier than July 1, 2028. The department’s regulations shall encourage recycling that minimizes generation of hazardous waste, generation of greenhouse gases, environmental impacts, environmental justice impacts, and public health impacts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42984.3.

(a) (1) “Apparel” means clothing and accessory items intended for regular wear or formal occasions and outdoor activities. For purposes of this chapter “apparel” includes only undergarments, shirts, pants, skirts, dresses, overalls, bodysuits, costumes, vests, dancewear, suits, saris, scarves, tops, leggings, school uniforms, leisurewear, athletic wear, sports uniforms, swimwear, formal wear, onesies, bibs, footwear, handbags, backpacks, knitted and woven accessories, jackets, coats, snow pants, ski pants, and everyday uniforms for workwear.

(2) “Apparel” does not include any of the following:

(A) Personal protective equipment or clothing items for use by the United States
 military.

(B) Personal protective equipment worn to protect the wearer from health or environmental hazards.

(C) Reusable products designed to collect and absorb urine and feces, or reusable products regulated by the United States Food and Drug Administration that are designed to collect and absorb menstruation or vaginal discharge.

(b) “Authorized collector” means a person or entity that has entered into an agreement with a PRO to collect covered products.

(c) “Authorized sorter” means a person or entity that has entered into an agreement with a PRO to sort covered products collected by authorized collectors.

(d) “Authorized repair business” means a person or entity that has entered into
 an agreement with a PRO to repair covered products for resale after collection by an authorized collector or after sorting by an authorized sorter.

(e) “Brand” means a trademark, including both a registered trademark and an unregistered trademark, a logo, a name, a symbol, a word, an identifier, or a traceable mark that identifies a covered product and identifies the owner or licensee of the brand.

(f) “Collection box” means an unattended container, box, receptacle, or similar device used for soliciting and collecting donations of covered products, including apparel or textile articles.

(g) “Collection site” means a permanent or temporary location operated by an authorized collector at which covered products are collected and prepared for transport in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

(h) “Consumer” means an owner of a covered product, including a person, business, corporation, limited partnership, nonprofit organization, or governmental entity, and includes the ultimate purchaser, owner, or lessee of a covered product, who is not, as to that covered product, the distributor, importer, producer, recycler, retailer, or PRO.

(i) (1) “Covered product” means an apparel or textile article.

(2) “Covered product” does not include any of the following:

(A) A product covered under the Used Mattress Recovery and Recycling Act (Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 42985)).

(B) A product covered under the Electronic Waste Recycling Act of 2003 (Chapter 8.5
 (commencing with Section 42460)).

(C) A product covered under the Product Stewardship for Carpets law (Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 42970)).

(D) An automated, motorized, battery, or manual window covering that is operated using an electric motor or other automated system, or manually adjusted by pulling cords or lifting mechanisms.

(j) “Department” means the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery or a successor agency.

(k) “Distributor” means a company that has a contractual relationship with one or more producers to market and sell covered products to a retailer.

(l) “Importer” means either of the following:

(1) A person qualifying as an importer of record for purposes of Section 1484(a)(2)(B) of Title 19 of the United States Code with regard to the import of a covered product that is sold, distributed for sale, or offered for sale in or into the state that was manufactured or assembled by a company outside of the United States.

(2) A person importing into the state for sale, distributing for sale, or offering for sale in the state a covered product that was manufactured or assembled by a company physically located outside of the state.

(m) “Local jurisdiction” means a city, county, city and county, or a regional agency formed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code or Article 3 (commencing with Section 40970) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of this code, or a special district that provides solid waste collection
 services.

(n) “Mail-back program” means a method of collecting covered products using prepaid, preaddressed mailing envelopes, boxes, or other means that are reusable, recyclable, or compostable.

(o) “Needs assessment” means a needs assessment prepared pursuant to Section 42984.6.

(p) “Nonprofit thrift store” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 6363.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(q) “Online marketplace” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 1749.8 of the Civil Code.

(r) “Person” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 40170.

(s) (1) “Producer” means a person who manufactures a
 covered product and who owns or is the licensee of the brand or trademark under which that covered product is sold, offered for sale, or distributed for sale in or into the state.

(2) If there is no person in the state who is the producer for purposes of paragraph (1), the producer of the covered product is the owner of a brand or trademark or, if the owner is not in the state, the exclusive licensee of a brand or trademark under which the covered product is sold, imported for sale, offered for sale, or distributed for sale in or into the state, regardless of whether the trademark is registered. For purposes of this subdivision, an exclusive licensee is a person holding the exclusive right to use a trademark or brand in the state in connection with the manufacture, sale, or distribution for sale in or into the state of the covered product.

(3) If there is no person in the state
 who is the producer for purposes of paragraph (1) or (2), then the producer of the covered product is the person that imports the covered product into the state for sale or distribution.

(4) If there is no other person in the state who is the producer for purposes of paragraph (1), (2), or (3), the producer of the covered product is the distributor, retailer, or wholesaler who sells the product in or into the state.

(5) For the purposes of this chapter, the sale of a covered product shall be deemed to occur in the state if the covered product is delivered to the consumer in the state.

(6) This chapter does not prohibit a person who manufactures, distributes, imports, offers for sale, or sells the covered product from assuming some or all of the duties and liabilities of the producer of the covered product and
 relieving from those duties and liabilities any other person who manufactures, distributes, imports, offers for sale, or sells the covered product.

(7) “Producer” does not include a seller that only sells secondhand covered products.

(8) “Producer” does not include a seller with less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) in annual aggregate global turnover adjusted annually pursuant to the California Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for all items, as determined by the Department of Industrial Relations. The aggregate global turnover of a producer within the meaning of this chapter shall be calculated by adding together the respective turnovers of all of the following:

(A) The producer concerned.

(B) Those entities in which the producer is
 concerned, directly or indirectly, as follows:

(i) Owns more than one-half the capital or business assets.

(ii) Has the power to exercise more than one-half the voting rights.

(iii) Has the power to appoint more than one-half the members of the supervisory board, the administrative board, or bodies legally representing the undertakings.

(iv) Has the right to manage the entities’ affairs.

(C) Those entities that have in the producer concerned the rights or powers listed in subparagraph (B).
